Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SCR1008.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 25-218, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE25-218. Surrogate parentage contracts; prohibition; custody; definition A. No person may enter into, induce, arrange, procure or otherwise assist in the formation of a surrogate parentage contract. B. A surrogate is the legal mother of a child born as a result of a surrogate parentage contract and is entitled to custody of that child. C. If the mother of a child born as a result of a surrogate parentage contract is married, her husband is presumed to be the legal father of the child. This presumption is rebuttable. D. For the purposes of this section, "surrogate parentage contract" means a contract, agreement or arrangement in which a woman agrees to the implantation of an embryo not related to that woman or agrees to conceive a child through natural or artificial insemination and to voluntarily relinquish her parental rights to the child. END_STATUTE 2. The Secretary of State shall submit this proposition to the voters at the next general election as provided by article IV, part 1, section 1, Constitution of Arizona.